Connecticut, session 2026, HB05533.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Election" has the same meaning as provided in section 9-1 of the
3 general statutes;
4 (2) "Elections site" means (A) a polling place on the day of an election,
5 primary or referendum, (B) a location designated for the conduct of
6 early voting during the period of early voting at an election or primary,
7 (C) a location for same-day election registration on the day of a regular
8 election, or (D) a drop box designated for the deposit of absentee ballots
9 during the period beginning on the first day of issuance of absentee
10 voting sets and ending at the close of the polls at an election, primary or
11 referendum;
12 (3) "Primary" has the same meaning as provided in section 9-372 or 9-
13 463 of the general statutes, as applicable; and
14 (4) "Referendum" has the same meaning as provided in section 9-1 of
15 the general statutes.
LCO 1 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
16 (b) (1) No officer or agent of any organization or entity authorized by
17 the federal government or by any state to use force against, search,
18 detain or arrest individuals, and no person authorized by the federal
19 government or by any state to order, bring, keep or have under such
20 person's authority or control any such officer or agent, shall (A)
21 knowingly be within two hundred fifty feet of any elections site, unless
22 (i) the Governor deems such force necessary to repel armed enemies of
23 the United States or of the state, (ii) in the case of any such search,
24 detention or arrest, such officer, agent or person (I) is acting in an official
25 capacity, (II) has given notice to the Secretary of the State and the
26 Attorney General not less than twenty-four hours prior to such search,
27 detention or arrest, and (III) is authorized by a judicial warrant or
28 judicial order of a court of competent jurisdiction to specifically conduct
29 such search, detention or arrest within two hundred fifty feet of such
30 elections site, and at the specific location at which such search, detention
31 or arrest is to be conducted, provided such officer, agent or person is
32 within such two hundred fifty feet only for as long as reasonably
33 necessary to conduct such search, detention or arrest, (iii) exigent
34 circumstances reasonably require the presence of any such officer, agent
35 or person to protect against a serious threat to life or property, provided
36 such officer, agent or person is within such two hundred fifty feet only
37 for as long as reasonably necessary to protect against such threat, or (iv)
38 the Secretary of the State or moderator (I) requests such force to
39 suppress disorder, or (II) has given permission for such an officer, agent
40 or person to be present and such permission has not been withdrawn,
41 (B) knowingly be within two hundred fifty feet of an elections site for
42 the purpose of attempting to examine the qualifications to vote of any
43 individual at such elections site, or (C) knowingly loiter or remain
44 within two hundred fifty feet of an elections site.
45 (2) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be construed to
46 (A) prevent any officer, agent or person described in said subdivision,
47 when off duty, from voting in accordance with the provisions of title 9
48 of the general statutes or otherwise engaging in protected political
49 expression, or (B) prohibit any such officer, agent or person from
LCO 2 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
50 passing within two hundred fifty feet of an elections site only for as long
51 as necessary to be within such two hundred fifty feet while on the way
52 to a place or location other than such elections site.
53 (c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, no
54 person shall wear any mask or other covering that obscures the face,
55 head or identity of such person within two hundred fifty feet of any
56 elections site.
57 (2) A person may wear such a mask or other covering within such
58 two hundred fifty feet if the wearing of such mask or other covering (A)
59 is reasonable given the weather conditions, provided such person
60 complies with any request from the moderator to remove such mask or
61 other covering, or (B) is medically necessary or of religious significance.
62 (d) (1) No person shall be required to present any form of
63 identification within two hundred fifty feet of any elections site.
64 (2) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be construed to
65 prevent any election, primary or referendum official from performing
66 any duty under title 9 of the general statutes.
67 (e) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
68 guilty of a class C felony and shall be disfranchised.
69 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
70 "person", "possess", "firearm", "deadly weapon" and "peace officer" have
71 the same meanings as provided in section 53a-3 of the general statutes;
72 "election" and "referendum" have the same meanings as provided in
73 section 9-1 of the general statutes; and "primary" has the same meaning
74 as provided in section 9-372 or 9-463 of the general statutes, as
75 applicable.
76 (b) A person is guilty of possession of a weapon near an elections site
77 when, knowing that such person is not permitted by law to do so, such
78 person possesses a firearm or deadly weapon within two hundred fifty
79 feet of any (1) polling place on the day of an election, primary or
LCO 3 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
80 referendum, (2) location designated for the conduct of early voting
81 during the period of early voting at an election or primary, (3) location
82 designated for same-day election registration on the day of a regular
83 election, (4) central location designated for the counting of absentee
84 ballots, early voting ballots or same-day election registration ballots at
85 an election, primary or referendum, as applicable, (5) place where a
86 recanvass is being conducted, or (6) drop box designated for the deposit
87 of absentee ballots during the period beginning on the first day of
88 issuance of absentee voting sets and ending at the close of the polls at
89 an election, primary or referendum.
90 (c) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to
91 the otherwise lawful possession of a firearm or deadly weapon:
92 (1) On private property that is not part of any elections site described
93 in subdivisions (1) to (6), inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section;
94 (2) That is (A) not loaded, and (B) in a locked container, or a locked
95 firearms rack, that is on a motor vehicle;
96 (3) In the case of any elections site described in subdivisions (1) to (6),
97 inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section that is in or on the real
98 property comprising a public or private elementary or secondary
99 school, by a person (A) for use in a program approved by school officials
100 in or on such school property, (B) in accordance with an agreement
101 entered into between school officials and such person or such person's
102 employer, or (C) while traversing such school property for the purpose
103 of gaining access to public or private lands open to hunting or for other
104 lawful purposes, provided such firearm or deadly weapon is not loaded
105 and the entry on such school property is permitted by the local or
106 regional board of education;
107 (4) By a peace officer while engaged in the performance of such peace
108 officer's official duties; and
109 (5) By a person passing within two hundred fifty feet of an elections
110 site described in subdivisions (1) to (6), inclusive, of subsection (b) of
LCO 4 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
111 this section only for as long as necessary to be within such two hundred
112 fifty feet while on the way to a place or location other than such elections
113 site.
114 (d) Possession of a weapon near an elections site is a (1) class D felony
115 for a first offense, and (2) class B felony for any subsequent offense.
116 Sec. 3. Section 9-364a of the general statutes is repealed and the
117 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
118 (a) As used in this section, "election worker" means any municipal
119 clerk, assistant municipal clerk, registrar of voters, deputy registrar of
120 voters, election official described in section 9-258, primary official
121 described in section 9-436 or recanvass official described in section 9-
122 311, and "personal identifying information" has the same meaning as
123 provided in section 53a-129a.
124 (b) Any person who influences or attempts to influence by force or
125 threat the vote, or by force, threat, bribery or corrupt means [,] the
126 speech, of any other person at a primary, caucus, referendum,
127 convention or election; any person who influences or attempts to
128 influence by force, threat or harassment any election worker in the
129 performance of any duty under the provisions of this title related to
130 election administration at a primary, referendum, election or recanvass;
131 any person who wilfully and fraudulently suppresses or destroys any
132 vote or ballot properly given or cast, whether so given or cast by mail,
133 by deposit in a secure drop box or in person at a polling place or
134 designated early voting or same-day election registration location, or
135 who, in counting such votes or ballots, wilfully miscounts or
136 misrepresents the number thereof; and any presiding or other officer of
137 a primary, caucus or convention who wilfully announces the result of a
138 ballot or vote of such primary, caucus or convention, untruly and
139 wrongfully, shall be guilty of a class C felony.
140 (c) Any person who, with intent to harass, terrorize or alarm any
141 election worker, or to improperly influence any election worker in the
142 performance of any duty under this title related to election
LCO 5 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
143 administration at a primary, referendum, election or recanvass, publicly
144 discloses the personal identifying information of such election worker
145 shall be guilty of a (1) class A misdemeanor for a first offense, and (2)
146 class C felony for any subsequent offense.
147 (d) Any election worker described in subsection (b) or (c) of this
148 section, as applicable, shall have a civil cause of action against the
149 person who, with respect to such election worker, violated said
150 subsection.
151 Sec. 4. Section 9-352 of the general statutes is repealed and the
152 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
153 (a) Any election official who, with intent to cause or permit any
154 voting tabulator to fail to correctly register all votes cast thereon, (1)
155 tampers with or disarranges [such tabulator] in any way such tabulator
156 or any part or appliance thereof, or (2) causes such tabulator to be used
157 or consents to its being used for voting at any election with knowledge
158 of the fact that the same is (A) not in order, or (B) not perfectly set and
159 adjusted to correctly register all votes cast thereon, [or] shall be guilty of
160 a class D felony.
161 (b) Any election official who, for the purpose of (1) defrauding or
162 deceiving any elector, or [of] (2) causing it to (A) be doubtful for what
163 candidate or candidates or proposition any vote is cast, or [causing it to]
164 (B) appear upon such tabulator that votes cast for one candidate or
165 proposition were cast for another candidate or proposition, removes,
166 changes or mutilates any ballot shall be guilty of a class D felony.
167 (c) Any election official who provides to any third party that has not
168 been authorized by the Secretary of the State any tabulator or any part
169 or appliance thereof shall be guilty of a class D felony.
170 Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Any person who knowingly (1)
171 tampers with, alters, destroys or unlawfully carries away a drop box
172 designated for the deposit of absentee ballots; (2) changes or destroys a
173 ballot after it has been deposited in such a drop box; (3) adds one or
LCO 6 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
174 more ballots to those which have been lawfully deposited in such a drop
175 box, whether before or after such ballots have been counted, by
176 fraudulently depositing such additional ballot or ballots into such drop
177 box in a manner not authorized by law and falsely claiming that such
178 additional ballot or ballots were lawfully deposited into such drop box,
179 with the intent to interrupt or invalidate an election, primary or
180 referendum; or (4) adds one or more ballots to those which have been
181 retrieved from such a drop box by fraudulently introducing such
182 additional ballot or ballots while such ballots are being counted or
183 recanvassed, with intent to affect the result of an election, primary or
184 referendum or to enter any ballot into evidence at any hearing held
185 pursuant to chapter 149 or 152 of the general statutes for the contest of
186 such election, primary or referendum, shall be guilty of a class D felony.
187 Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) If any municipal official,
188 including any election worker, as defined in section 9-364a of the
189 general statutes, as amended by this act, receives from any private or
190 governmental entity, individual or official a subpoena, warrant or other
191 request for or to inspect any record or recording of or produced at, or
192 any tabulator, ballot box or other device used in the conduct of, any
193 election, primary or referendum, such municipal official shall, not later
194 than thirty-six hours after the receipt of such subpoena, warrant or other
195 request, provide a copy of such subpoena, warrant or other request to
196 the offices of the Attorney General and the Secretary of the State. The
197 offices of the Attorney General and the Secretary of the State shall post
198 notice, on each of said offices' Internet web sites, of the methods by
199 which a municipal official may provide such copy to said offices. In the
200 case of the Secretary of the State receiving such a subpoena, warrant or
201 other request, the Secretary shall immediately provide a copy of such
202 subpoena, warrant or other request to the office of the Attorney General.
203 Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
204 "election worker" means any municipal clerk, assistant municipal clerk,
205 registrar of voters, deputy registrar of voters or election official
206 described in section 9-258 of the general statutes.
LCO 7 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
207 (b) The Attorney General may seek preliminary or permanent
208 injunctive, declaratory or other appropriate equitable relief to prevent
209 or redress interference in connection with any election for presidential
210 electors, a senator in Congress or representative in Congress by bringing
211 a complaint to any judge of the Supreme Court, in which the Attorney
212 General shall set out the claimed interference. The Attorney General
213 shall file a certification attached to the complaint indicating that a copy
214 of the complaint has been sent by first-class mail or delivered to the
215 Secretary of the State, the State Elections Enforcement Commission and
216 any other interested party. If such complaint is made prior to such
217 election, such judge shall proceed expeditiously to render judgment on
218 the complaint and shall cause notice of the hearing to be given to the
219 Secretary of the State and the State Elections Enforcement Commission.
220 If such complaint is made subsequent to the election, it shall be brought
221 not later than fourteen days after the election. Upon receipt of such
222 complaint, such judge shall forthwith order any injunctive or
223 declaratory relief necessary to preserve or restore the status quo,
224 including, but not limited to, ordering that an election worker retain
225 custody of any record or recording of or produced at, or any tabulator,
226 ballot box or other device used in the conduct of, such election. Upon a
227 showing of exigent circumstances, such judge may issue an immediate
228 ex parte order granting such relief as such judge deems appropriate.
229 Such judge shall forthwith order a hearing to be had upon such
230 complaint, upon a day not more than five or less than three days from
231 the making of such order, and shall cause notice of not less than three or
232 more than five days to be given to any candidate or candidates whose
233 election may be affected by the decision upon such hearing, to any
234 election worker who may be affected by the decision upon such hearing,
235 to the Secretary of the State, to the State Elections Enforcement
236 Commission and to any other party or parties whom such judge deems
237 proper parties thereto, of the time and place for the hearing upon such
238 complaint. Such judge, with two other judges of the Supreme Court to
239 be designated by the Chief Court Administrator, shall, on the day fixed
240 for such hearing and without unnecessary delay, proceed to hear the
241 parties. If sufficient reason is shown, such judges may order that the
LCO 8 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
242 State Elections Enforcement Commission maintain custody of any
243 record or recording of or produced at, or any tabulator, ballot box or
244 other device used in the conduct of, such election. If sufficient reason is
245 shown, such judges may order permanent injunctive, declaratory or
246 other appropriate equitable relief in connection with the State Elections
247 Enforcement Commission or election worker custody of any record or
248 recording of or produced at, or any tabulator, ballot box or other device
249 used in the conduct of, such election.
250 Sec. 8. Subsection (a) of section 3-129g of the 2026 supplement to the
251 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
252 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
253 (a) The Attorney General may investigate, intervene in or bring a civil
254 or administrative action in the name of the state, seeking injunctive or
255 declaratory relief, damages, and any other relief that may be available
256 under law, whenever any person is or has engaged in a practice or
257 pattern of conduct, or has established a policy, that:
258 (1) Subjects, or causes to be subjected, other persons to the
259 deprivation of any rights, privileges or immunities secured by the
260 constitutions or laws of this state or the United States; or
261 (2) Interferes, or attempts to interfere, by threats, intimidation, [or]
262 coercion or physical obstruction, with the exercise or enjoyment by other
263 persons of any rights, privileges or immunities secured by the
264 constitutions or laws of this state or the United States.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 9-364a
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 9-352
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 New section
LCO 9 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 5533
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026 3-129g(a)
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 10 of 10